Nevada, session 83, SB453.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to restore the balance in the Reserve for Statutory Contingency
Account created by NRS 353.264 the sum of $9,835,522.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)